District of Columbia statutes.
24-283

Uses of Inmate Welfare Fund.

The Fund shall be used for the following purposes, in order of priority:

(1)

To stock the commissaries of District correctional facilities;

(2)

To repay the initial appropriation used to finance the Fund; and

(3)

To provide goods and services that benefit the general inmate population at District correctional facilities, as determined by the Inmate Welfare Fund Committee established in § 24-284.

History

Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-192, § 3004, 53 DCR 6899

Section References

This section is referenced in § 24-282.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3004 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-477, August 8, 2006, 53 DCR 7068).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3004 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-499, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 8845).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3004 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-1, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1165).